Illinois, session 104th, SB2192.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Preventing Targeted Violence Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose.    The purpose of this Act is to 7establish community support teams that work to prevent 8targeted violence incidents by:9        (1) providing case review and behavioral threat 10    assessment and management consultation to participating 11    member agencies;12        (2) supporting targeted violence prevention efforts by 13    working as a centralized information hub for local, State, 14    and federal resources; and15        (3) increasing the capacities and competencies of 16    organizations and communities by educating and training 17    employees and community members about targeted violence 18    and behaviors that may indicate concern. 19    Section 10. Participating member agencies. 20    (a) A participating member agency is any agency, 21organization, or entity located in or serving the geographic 22area encompassed by the community support team that may elect   SB2192- 2 -LRB104 09373 RTM 19432 b1to present a case to the community support team for case review 2and behavioral threat assessment and management consultation.3    (b) Participating member agencies shall sign a memorandum 4of understanding to participate in the community support team.5    (c) Participating member agencies may elect an Executive 6Board of at least 5 executive members selected from 7participating member agencies to oversee the activities of 8their community support team. 9    Section 15. Community support teams. 10    (a) A community support team may be established by a unit 11of local government. Membership of the community support teams 12is limited to participating member agencies. Membership of a 13community support team shall include at least one member from 14the following entities:15        (1) a municipal law enforcement officer, sheriff's 16    deputy, or state certified law enforcement officer;17        (2) a licensed mental health professional such as a 18    psychiatrist, clinical psychologist, license clinical 19    professional counselor, or licensed clinical social 20    worker;21        (3) an expert trained in behavioral threat assessment 22    and management; and23        (4) a member of the States' Attorney's Office; a 24    public school administrator, teacher, or school support 25    staff person licensed and endorsed by the Illinois State   SB2192- 3 -LRB104 09373 RTM 19432 b1    Board of Education; a representative of a university or 2    community college; a representative from the county Public 3    Health Department; a representative from the county Office 4    of Homeland Security; a representative from the State or 5    federal Department of Veterans Affairs; a representative 6    from a domestic violence service provider; a 7    representative from a social service provider; a 8    representative from the private business sector; a 9    representative from the private business sector; a 10    probation or parole officer; a member of the clergy or 11    other representative of the faith community; or a 12    representative from a Hospital or medical clinic.13    (b) A member of a community support team shall be 14appointed by the head of the participating member agency. 15    Section 20. Duties and responsibilities of community 16support teams.17    (a) Each community support team shall carry out the 18following duties and responsibilities:19        (1) Form a community support team consistent with 20    Section 15 of this Act.21        (2) Maintain the names, professional titles, and 22    business contact information of each community safety team 23    member.24        (3) Ensure that each member of the community safety 25    team completes, at minimum, the frontline practitioner and   SB2192- 4 -LRB104 09373 RTM 19432 b1    the community safety team trainings developed by the 2    University of Illinois-Chicago.3        (4) Meet at least monthly.4        (5) Execute memorandums of understanding with 5    participating member agencies.6        (6) Execute confidentiality agreements with each 7    member of the community safety teams or any other 8    participant present during a case review.9        (7) Conduct case reviews and behavioral threat 10    assessment and management consultations.11    (b) Each community support team may carry out the 12following duties and responsibilities:13        (1) Conduct case reviews and behavioral threat 14    assessment and management consultation at the request of 15    participating member agencies.16        (2) Seek funds to support the operations of the 17    community support team.18        (3) Collect and document information from local, 19    State, and federal resources.20        (4) Assist agencies with developing education and 21    training plans specific to targeted violence and behaviors 22    that may indicate concern.23        (5) Facilitate education and training events for 24    agencies and community members.25        (6) Engage in any other activities that enable the 26    community support team to carry out the purpose of this   SB2192- 5 -LRB104 09373 RTM 19432 b1    Act. 2    Section 25. Confidentiality of community support teams.3    (a) Community support teams shall comply with all 4applicable laws governing the sharing of confidential records.5    (b) Meetings in which the community support team is 6engaged in any activity related to case review, behavioral 7threat assessment and management consultation, or in which 8confidential information is shared or disclosed related to 9cases are closed to the public and not subject to Section 2 of 10the Open Meetings Act.11    (c) Unless otherwise available and lawfully obtained 12through another source pursuant to an applicable law that 13allows the disclosure and release of the information, 14confidential information discussed during a case review is 15not:16        (1) subject to the Freedom of Information Act;17        (2) subject to subpoena and discovery under Section 18    2-402 of the Code of Civil Procedure, Article 115 of the 19    Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, or Illinois Supreme 20    Court Rule 412; and21        (3) admissible as evidence in any civil or criminal 22    proceeding.23    (d) All participating member agencies must sign a 24memorandum of understanding to be able to present cases to the 25community support team.  SB2192- 6 -LRB104 09373 RTM 19432 b1    (e) All community support team members, community support 2team staff, and any other person who participates in any 3manner in a case review or behavioral threat assessment and 4management consultation shall execute a confidentiality 5agreement that acknowledges and agrees to comply with the 6responsibility not to disclose or release any confidential 7information. All executed confidentiality agreements shall be 8maintained by the community support team.9    (f) Community support team members, community support team 10staff, and participating member agency staff cannot be subject 11to examination or compelled to disclose or release 12confidential information in any administrative, civil, or 13criminal proceeding, except for information that is otherwise 14available and lawfully obtained through another source 15pursuant to an applicable law that allows the disclosure and 16release of the information. 17    Section 30. Penalty for unlawful disclosure of 18confidential information. Anyone who discloses, receives, 19makes use of, or knowingly permits the use of any confidential 20information in violation of this Act commits a Class A 21misdemeanor. 22    Section 35. Immunity. If acting in good faith, without 23malice, and within the protocols established by this Act, then 24members of the community support team, community support team   SB2192- 7 -LRB104 09373 RTM 19432 b1staff, participating member agency staff, and anyone 2participating in a case review shall have immunity from 3administrative, civil, or criminal liability for an act or 4omission related to the participation in a case review, 5notwithstanding Section 30.